District of Columbia statutes.
48-921.02a

Articulable suspicion.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, none of the following shall, individually or in combination with each other, constitute reasonable articulable suspicion of a crime:

(1)

The odor of marijuana or of burnt marijuana;

(2)

The possession of or the suspicion of possession of marijuana without evidence of quantity in excess of 1 ounce;

(3)

The possession of multiple containers of marijuana without evidence of quantity in excess of 1 ounce; or

(4)

The possession of marijuana in proximity to any amount of cash or currency without evidence of marijuana quantity in excess of one ounce

(b)

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply when a law enforcement officer is investigating whether a person is operating or in physical control of a vehicle or watercraft while intoxicated, under the influence of, or impaired by alcohol or a drug or any combination thereof in violation of subchapter III-A of Chapter 22 of Title 50 [§ 50-2206.01 et seq.].

June 20, 1938, 52 Stat. 792, ch. 532, § 14a
as added July 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-126, § 407(b), 61 DCR 3482
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-126 added this section.
Section 501 of D.C. Law 20-126 provided that the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.